Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.080

Licensed private security companies—Certificate of insurance required.

A licensed private security company shall file and maintain with the director a certificate of insurance as evidence that it has comprehensive general liability coverage of at least twenty-five thousand dollars for bodily or personal injury and twenty-five thousand dollars for property damage.

[ 1991 c 334 s 8.]